California, session 20252026, AB2714.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 976 of the Unemployment Insurance Code is amended to read:976. Employer contributions to the Unemployment Fund shall accrue and become payable by every employer, except an employer as defined by Section 676, for each calendar year with respect to wages paid for employment. The contributions are due and shall be paid to the department for the Unemployment Fund by each employer in accordance with this division and shall not be deducted in whole or in part from the wages of individuals in his employ. their employees.